Illinois, session 104th, HB4108.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 7-606.5 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/7-606.5 new)7    Sec. 7-606.5. Notice requirement. If an insurance company 8fails to respond to a request for verification of insurance by 9the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall send a 10notice, by certified mail, to the owner of a vehicle that the 11insurance failed to respond. The Secretary of State shall 12establish an email alert system to send an alert regarding an 13insurance company's failure to respond to a request for 14verification of insurance to the owner of a vehicle if the 15owner has provided an email to the Secretary of State. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.